California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a nonprofit organization which elected reimbursement financing under Section 803 and which has acquired a previously accumulated favorable reserve account under Section 712 or 713 shall be liable for the reimbursement of benefits pursuant to such election for any benefits chargeable to the reserve account and based upon wages paid prior to such election, to the extent that such benefits exceed the previously accumulated favorable reserve account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

The director shall notify the United States Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor of the failure of any Indian tribe (as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code) to make a payment or post a bond as required under subdivision (b) of Section 803 within 90 days of the delinquency date of a notice to the tribe specifying the amount due under that subdivision. If the amount due is subsequently paid by the Indian tribe, the director shall notify the United States Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor of the satisfaction of the liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 514.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

An unregistered organization described in Section 608, and which has been determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be exempt under Section 501(a) as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may elect reimbursement financing under Section 801 when the director finds that it has good cause for failing to register as an employer under this division. The election under Section 801 shall be from the time the organization became an employer. The organization shall, upon election, be liable for reimbursement of the cost of benefits chargeable to the organization from the time it became an employer. Payment of the cost of benefits shall be as provided in Section 803 except that benefits paid more than 30 days prior to the date of election under Section 801 shall accrue interest as provided in Section 1113. The election under Section 801 shall be subject to all provisions of Section 803.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 457, Sec. 8.   Effective September 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

(a) The department shall give notice, as required by Section 1327, to each public entity, as defined by Section 605, which has elected a method of financing under Section 803 at a single address to be selected by the entity.

(b) The department shall implement subdivision (a) according to the following schedule:

(1) For the State of California, by July 1, 1986.

(2) For all public entities with more than 100 employees, by October 1, 1986. 

(3) For all other local public entities, by January 1, 1987.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1217, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financing Unemployment Insurance Coverage for Public School Employees [821. - 832.]

821.

(a) Each school employer may, in lieu of the contributions required of employers, elect to pay into the Unemployment Fund the cost of benefits, including extended duration benefits and federal-state extended benefits, paid based on base period wages with respect to employment for an employing unit and charged to its account in the manner provided by Section 1026, pursuant to authorized regulations that shall
 prescribe the rate or amount, time, manner, and method of payment or advance payment or providing a good and sufficient bond to guarantee payment of contributions. The provisions of this article shall apply to school employers who have elected financing under this section.

(b) Sections 1030, 1031, 1032, and 1032.5, and any provision of this division for the noncharging of benefits to the account of an employer, shall not apply to an employing unit under subdivision (a). The cost of benefits charged to a school employer under this section shall include, but not be limited to, benefits or payments improperly paid in excess of a weekly benefit amount, or in excess of a maximum benefit amount, or otherwise in excess of the amount that should have been paid, due to any computational or other error of any type by the Employment Development Department or the Department of Benefit Payments, whether or not the error could be anticipated.

(c) The cost of benefits charged to a school employer under this section shall include credits of benefit overpayments actually collected by the department, unless the department determines that the payment was made because the school employer, or an agent of the school employer, was at fault for failing to respond timely or adequately to requests of the department for information relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. The department shall make this determination when the school employer or agent fails to respond timely or adequately in two instances relating to the individual claim for unemployment compensation benefits. This subdivision shall apply to benefit overpayments established on or after October 22, 2013.

(d) In making the payments prescribed by subdivision (a), there shall be paid or credited to the Unemployment Fund, either in advance or
 by way of reimbursement, as may be determined by the director, any sums he or she estimates the Unemployment Fund will be entitled to receive from each employing unit for each calendar quarter, reduced or increased by any sum by which he or she finds that his or her estimates for any prior calendar quarter were greater or less than the amounts that should have been paid to the fund. These estimates may be made upon the basis of a statistical sampling, or other method as may be determined by the director.

Upon making the determination, the director shall mail notice of the determination, pursuant to Section 1206, to the employing unit.

The director may cancel any contributions or portion thereof that he or she finds have been erroneously determined. The contributions due from the employing units shall be paid, transferred, or credited from the School Employees Fund established in the State Treasury by Section 822 to the
 Unemployment Fund by the State Treasurer, State Controller, or other officer or person responsible for disbursements on behalf of the employing unit within 30 days of the date of mailing of the director’s notice of determination to the employing unit.

Each employing unit shall send a copy of any and all notices, billings, or correspondence not normally routed to the administrator and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, regarding unemployment insurance for the school employees, to the administrator, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the county superintendent of schools, or agent thereof, with timely documentation of charges or determination. Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 with respect to the assessment of contributions, and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1701) with respect to the collection of contributions, shall apply to the assessments provided by this article. Sections 1177 to 1184, inclusive, relating to refunds and
 overpayments, shall apply to amounts paid to the Unemployment Fund pursuant to this section. Sections 1222, 1223, 1224, 1241, and 1242 shall apply to matters arising under this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no employing unit shall be liable for that portion of any extended duration benefits or federal-state extended benefits that is reimbursed or reimbursable by the federal government to the state.

(f) To the extent permitted by federal law, including Section 121(e) of Public Law 94-566, any school employer that elects a method of financing under this article shall not be liable to reimburse the cost of benefits paid to any individual whose base period wages include wages for services performed prior to January 1, 1978, if the benefits are reimbursable by the federal government under Section 121 of Public Law 94-566 and to the extent that the
 individual would not have been eligible for the benefits had this state not provided for benefits payable based on services performed prior to January 1, 1978.

(g) The administrator and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of their respective functions under this article in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Regulations of the administrator shall be subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 301) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1. Rules and regulations of the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 301) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1.

(h) Any election for financing coverage under this section shall take effect with respect to services performed from and
 after the first day of the calendar quarter in which the election is filed with the director, and shall continue in effect for not less than two full calendar years. Thereafter, the election under this section may be terminated as of January 1 of any calendar year only if the school employer, on or before the 31st day of January of that year, has filed with the director a written application for termination. The director may for good cause waive the requirement that a written application for termination shall be filed on or before the 31st day of January. School employers shall be prohibited from making a subsequent reelection under this section for 10 years from the date of termination of an election under this section. An election for financing coverage under this section is deemed to have been filed by every school employer effective as of January 1, 1976, is deemed to have been in effect for two calendar years prior to January 1, 1978, and may be terminated as of January 1, 1978, or as of January 1,
 1980, or any later January 1 pursuant to this section. Upon the termination of any election under this section, the school employer shall be and remain liable for all benefits paid based upon wages paid by the school employer during the period of an election under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

821.3.

As used in this article, “administrator” means the Director of Employment Development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

821.4.

As used in this article, “employing unit” and “school employer” means the governing board of any school district or community college district, any county board of education, any county superintendent of schools, or any personnel commission of a school district or community college district which has a merit system pursuant to any provision of the Education Code, or any instrumentality of the foregoing, or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing, which employs one or more employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

821.5.

The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1326) of Chapter 5 of this part relating to filing, determination, and payments of unemployment compensation benefit claims, and all other provisions of this part not inconsistent with this article, shall apply to all claims and matters arising under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

822.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the “School Employees Fund.” The School Employees Fund is the successor of the “Classified School Employees Fund.” Moneys received pursuant to Section 823, together with any charges, notices, fees, interest, penalties, assessments, or other revenue, shall be deposited in this fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated to the administrator without regard to fiscal year for carrying out the purposes of this article, for administrative costs, for making refunds, and for investment
 through the Surplus Money Investment Fund, with any interest or earnings credited to the School Employees Fund. Funds to be used for administrative costs shall be budgeted and expended in accordance with existing state law.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the School Employees Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the School Employees Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the School Employees Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 20.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

823.

(a) For the purpose of payment by each school employer of all or part of the charges for unemployment compensation benefits, fees, assessments, interest, penalties, billings, notices, and other expenses of unemployment insurance for school employees pursuant to this part, moneys budgeted pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be remitted by the school employer or on the school employer’s behalf by the county auditor to the Treasurer pursuant to this article, and shall be deposited in the School Employees Fund.

(b) (1) For each fiscal year, except as provided in subdivision (c), each school employer shall budget and remit on or before the last day of the
 calendar month following the close of each calendar quarter to the Treasurer for deposit in the School Employees Fund in the State Treasury an amount determined by multiplying the contribution rate for the fiscal year by the total wages, including taxable wages as well as wages which would be taxable except for the limitation on taxable wages provided under Section 930, but excluding, to the extent permitted by federal law, wages paid to any individual to the extent that federal law provides for reimbursement to the State of California for all benefits paid from the Unemployment Fund to the individual based on the wages.

The administrator shall, not later than March 31 each year, notify all school employers participating in the School Employees Fund of the contribution rate for the succeeding fiscal year.

(2) The contribution rate for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1988, and for each subsequent fiscal year shall be two times the amount disbursed for claims management fees, unemployment insurance benefit charges, and School Employees Fund administrative expenditures from the School Employees Fund during the 12-month period ending December 31 and immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the rate is to be effective, less the amount in the School Employees Fund on that December 31, with the resulting figure divided by total wages as described in paragraph (1) for the 12-month period ending June 30 and immediately preceding that December 31, and then rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of 1 percent. In no event shall the contribution rate be less than five one-hundredths of 1 percent.

(c) If the administrator finds
 that the ability of the School Employees Fund to meet its estimated obligations promptly when due will become endangered, the administrator shall increase the contribution rate otherwise provided by this section to a level estimated to be needed to protect the solvency of the fund, except that the rate shall not be increased to more than three-tenths of 1 percent. If the administrator finds that the School Employees Fund balance is in excess of an adequate reserve to meet its estimated obligations promptly when due, the administrator shall, after consultation with the fund’s School Advisory Committee, decrease the contribution rate otherwise provided by this section, except that the rate shall not be decreased to less than one-tenth of 1 percent. The administrator shall notify all school employers participating in the fund of any increased or decreased contribution rate under this authority.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 9.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

The administrator of the School Employees Fund shall, based on the total number of covered employees reflected on reports received by March 31, 1978, and by November 30, 1978, and each year thereafter by November 30, make a transfer from available interest earnings pursuant to investments authorized by Section 822 to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to support an Unemployment Insurance Management System and appeals program as set forth in Section 1330 of the Education Code. Such transfers shall be equal to two dollars ($2) per covered employee, less administrative costs of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and
 the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and shall be made by April 30, 1978, and by December 31, 1978, and each year thereafter by December 31, to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, as appropriate, and expended only for the purposes set forth in Section 1330 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

Whenever the unencumbered balance of interest deposited in or earned by the School Employees Fund, after deducting administrative expenses paid or encumbered, exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000) as of the close of each fiscal year, the unencumbered balance shall be credited as of the close of that fiscal year to the account of each school employer which has a positive balance in the fund, in the proportion that each positive account balance bears to the total of all positive account balances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1018, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

828.

Each school employer shall be responsible for a quarterly local experience charge as set forth below, together with the charges or penalties set by the administrator for administrative indiscretions, including tardiness and error, as well as all costs for benefits and administration resulting from failure to properly cover an employee. The reimbursement for charges shall be delinquent 30 days from the date of notice and if not paid within the time required, the school employer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the unpaid amount, plus interest at the adjusted
 annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code from and after the date of delinquency until paid. The local experience charge to be levied against each school employer shall be computed as follows:

Local Experience Charge

(a) The local experience charge rate shall be 10 percent for the first three complete fiscal years of participation in the School Employees Fund.

(b) The local experience charge rate for the fourth fiscal year, and each succeeding fiscal year, shall be determined by dividing the reserve balance at the end of the fiscal year which began 24 months prior to the fiscal year for which the rate is being calculated by the benefits paid for that same prior fiscal year.

The factor derived is the employer’s reserve ratio. If, as of the
 computation date, the school employer’s reserve ratio equals or exceeds that which appears on any line in column 1 of the following table, but is less than that which appears in column 2 of that table, the local experience charge rate shall be the figure appearing on that same line in column 3 of that table.(Column 1)(Column 2)(Column 3)LineReserve RatioRate1 negativeto1.0015%2 1.00to2.0010%3 2.00to3.00 5%4 3.00ormore 0%(c) The rate determined in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be multiplied by the employer’s quarterly benefit charges to compute the local experience charges.

The administrator shall, not later than March 31 of each year, notify each school employer participating in the School Employees Fund of their local experience charge rate for the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

829.

The total amount of the local experience charge computed for each school employer pursuant to Section 828 shall be the amount that the school employer, county superintendent of schools, or empowered entity shall, on behalf of the employers under that jurisdiction, reimburse the School Employees Fund in the State Treasury. However, this amount shall not exceed 1.7 percent of the actual annual wages paid by a school employer in the immediately preceding calendar year as indicated in the four quarterly reports to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

There is hereby created a School Employer Advisory Committee of five persons. The committee shall consist of one person appointed by each of the following: the State Superintendent of Public Instruction, Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, Association of School Administrators, California School Business Officials, and the California School Board Association.

All such members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power and their only compensation shall be per diem expenses for attending meetings, which shall be a cost of administration of the School Employees Fund. The advisory committee shall select a chairperson and
 meet at least semiannually with the administrator to consider and recommend improvements concerning the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

832.

The administrator shall at least annually calculate, as of the close of and for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the experiences of school employers relative to usage of the Unemployment Fund. The calculations shall include tabulations on the experience of each school employer in relation to the expenditures from and the income to the School Employees Fund from the wages paid by the employer. All school employers shall be listed and ranked by ratio of use. The report shall contain comments and recommendations on improvements to the administration, enforcement,
 and financing of the provisions relative to this article. The report by the administrator on the above shall be made each year to the affected school employer and governing board thereof prior to March 31.

The administrator shall develop experience relationships on all benefits paid to employees via the School Employees Fund and on school employers’ experience related to use and exposure. Data shall relate to numbers of employees and types of programs and shall be calculated as of the close of and for the immediately preceding fiscal year. A report by the administrator on the above shall be made each year to the Legislature prior to March 31 containing comments and recommendations on improvement to administration, enforcement and financing of the provisions relative thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Contributions and Reports [901. - 1243.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [901. - 906.]

901.

The definitions set forth in this article are applicable to this chapter only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

“Computation date” means the close of business on June 30th, of each calendar year for the purpose of establishing contribution rates for the next succeeding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

“Rating period” means the full calendar year next succeeding any computation date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

“Net balance of reserve” means the excess, if any, of credits required to be made to any employer’s account over the charges against that account as of any computation date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

905.

“Average base pay roll” means the quotient obtained by dividing by three the total amount of taxable wages paid by an employer during the most recent period of three consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the computation date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

“Contributions paid on his own behalf” means:

(a) All contributions paid under this part to the Unemployment Fund on behalf of an employer with respect to wages paid by him on or before the computation date for any rating period, which have been paid on or before the end of the calendar month next succeeding such computation date.

(b) Any additional amount of contributions paid under this part to the Unemployment Fund on behalf of an employer with respect to wages paid by him on or before the computation date for any rating
 period, which have been assessed pursuant to Section 1036 and have been paid before the delinquent date for the calendar quarter in which he is given notice of the assessment pursuant to Section 1036. 

(c) Any additional contributions paid pursuant to Section 976.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1146, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. “Wages,” the Basis of the Contribution [926. - 940.]

926.

Except as otherwise provided in this article “wages” means all remuneration payable to an employee for personal services, whether by private agreement or consent or by force of statute, including commissions and bonuses, and the reasonable cash value of all remuneration payable to an employee in any medium other than cash.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

926.5.

“Wages” also means all remuneration payable for personal services, as specified in Section 926, when the legal obligation for the payment of such wages is assumed by an employer specified in Section 678, and the first or prior employer for whom the personal services were originally performed is relieved of the legal obligation for the payment of such remuneration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 873.)
-------------------------------------------

927.

“Wages” also means all tips which are received while performing services which constitute employment and included in a written statement furnished to the employer pursuant to Section 6053(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The changes in law made in this section by Chapter 1461 of the Statutes of 1985 shall apply with respect to wages earned on and after January 1, 1986, in conformity with the provisions of federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   Effective February 5, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

928.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions and qualifications of deferred compensation plans shall be determined for purposes of this part in accordance with Subchapter D (commencing with Section 401) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code. When applying the Internal Revenue Code for the purposes of this part, any reference to regulations of the Internal Revenue Service shall not apply if the Employment Development Department has adopted and issued regulations on this subject. In the absence of regulations issued by the Employment Development Department, regulations issued under the Internal Revenue Code shall govern the
 interpretation of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

928.5.

“Wages” also includes all of the following:

(a) Any employer contributions under a qualified cash or deferred arrangement, as defined by Section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent the amount is excluded from the gross income of the employee under Section
 402(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Any amount treated as an employer contribution under a state pickup plan as defined by Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, only if the payments are made pursuant to a salary reduction arrangement.

(c) Any amount deferred under a nonqualified deferred compensation plan shall be taken into account, for purposes of this article, on the later of the following:

(1) When the services are performed.

(2) When there is no substantial risk of forfeiture of the right to the amount.

(d) Any amount taken into account as “wages” by reason of subdivision (c), and the income attributable thereto, shall be taxed only once and shall not thereafter be
 treated as “wages” for purposes of this article.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “nonqualified deferred compensation plan” means any plan or arrangement for deferral of compensation other than a plan described under Section 934.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 107.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

928.7.

“Wages” includes compensation, that is deductible under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to a member of a limited liability company filing a federal corporate income tax return.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 522, Sec. 3.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

929.

“Wages” does not include the actual amount of any required or necessary business expense incurred by an individual in connection with his employment, or, in lieu of the actual amount of such expenses, the reasonably estimated amount allowed therefor pursuant to authorized regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

930.

“Wages” does not include remuneration in excess of seven thousand dollars ($7,000) paid to an individual by an employer during any calendar year, with respect to employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1275, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

930.1.

For the purpose of determining whether an employer has paid remuneration with respect to employment in excess of the limitation prescribed by Section 930 to an individual during any calendar year, the remuneration shall be deemed to include any remuneration paid to the individual by the employer for services constituting employment under the unemployment compensation law of another state which the employer has reported to the other state as wages for contribution purposes. As used in this section, “remuneration” does not include the remuneration of the type described in Sections 931, 931.5, 933, 934, 935, 936, 937, 938, 938.1, and 938.3 when paid by the
 employer in another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

930.5.

If an employer during any calendar year acquires substantially all the property used in a trade or business of another employer, or used in a separate unit of a trade or business of the other employer, and immediately after the acquisition employs in his or her trade or business an individual who immediately prior to the acquisition was employed in the trade or business of the employer from whom the property was acquired, then, for the purpose of determining whether the acquiring employer has paid remuneration with respect to employment in excess of the limitation prescribed by Section 930, or the limitation prescribed by Section 985, to the individual
 during the calendar year, any remuneration with respect to employment paid to the individual by the employer from whom the property was acquired during the calendar year and prior to the acquisition shall be considered as having been paid by the acquiring employer. As used in this section, “remuneration” does not include the remuneration referred to in Sections 931, 931.5, 933, 934, 935, 936, 937, 938, 938.1, and 938.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

931.

“Wages” does not include the amount of any payment, including any amount paid by an employer for insurance or annuities, or into a fund, to provide for any payment, made to or on behalf of an employee or any of his or her dependents under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provision for his or her employees generally, or for his or her employees generally and their dependents, or for a class or classes of his or her employees, or for a class or classes of his or her employees and their dependents, on account of any of the following:

(a) Sickness or accident disability,
 but in the case of payments made to an employee or any of his or her dependents, this subdivision shall exclude from “wages” only those payments which are received under a workers’ compensation law. 

(b) Medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability.

(c) Death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

931.5.

(a) Except for Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division and Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000), any third party which makes a payment included in the term “wages” solely by reason of subdivision (a) of Section 931 shall be the employer with respect to those wages unless the third-party payer notifies the last employer, who is a member of the plan and for whom the services were performed, within 15 days of payment, and provides all of the following information to that last employer:

(1) The name and social security account number of the recipients of the wages paid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 931.

(2) The amount of gross wages paid pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 931.

(b) The special rule prescribed by this subdivision applies to the payment of sick pay made by a third-party payer, such as an insurer, under a contract of insurance pursuant to a multiple employer plan that is obligated to make payments for sick pay to employees of participating employers. If the third-party payer provides the plan with the notification required by subdivision (a) within the time required, the plan, not the third-party payer, shall be treated as the employer under subdivision (a). If within six business days after receipt of the notification the plan similarly notifies the last employer for whom the
 services are performed, and who is a plan member, that employer, not the plan, shall be required to report and pay the contributions due with respect to the wages.

(c) The employer, as determined by subdivision (a) or (b), shall pay contributions, required by this part, except as provided in Sections 984 and 986, and shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1088.

(d) When an employer receives the notification prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b), the wages described therein shall be deemed paid when the notice is received.

(e) The director shall not make an assessment pursuant to Section 1126, 1127, or 1137 to assess employee contributions required by Sections 984 and 13020 on third-party sick pay as described in subdivision (a) for the period from January 1, 1987, through the date on which
 this subdivision became effective.

(f) Except as provided by Section 1176 and Section 19301 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no refunds may be made for employee contributions required by Sections 984 and 13020 paid on third-party sick pay as described in subdivision (a) for the period from January 1, 1987, through the date on which this subdivision became effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

933.

“Wages” does not include any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability made by an employer to, or on behalf of, an employee after the expiration of six calendar months following the last calendar month in which the employee worked for such employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

934.

“Wages” does not include any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or his or her beneficiary:

(a) From or to a trust described in Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under Section 501(a) of that code at
 the time of the payment, unless the payment is made to an employee of the trust as remuneration for services rendered as an employee and not as a beneficiary of the trust.

(b) Under or to an annuity plan which, at the time of the payment, is a plan described in Section 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Under a simplified employee pension, as defined in Section 408(k)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, other than any contributions described in Section 408(k)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) Under a simple retirement account, as described in Section 408(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, other than any elective contributions under Section 408(p)(2)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) Under or to an annuity contract described in Section 403(b)
 of the Internal Revenue Code, other than a payment for the purchase of the contract which is made by reason of a salary reduction agreement, whether evidenced by a written instrument or otherwise.

(f) Under or to an exempt governmental deferred compensation plan, as defined in Section 3121(v)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) To supplement pension benefits under a plan or trust described in any of the foregoing provisions of this section to take into account some portion or all of the increase in the cost of living, as determined by the Secretary of Labor, since retirement, but only if the supplemental payments are under a plan which is treated as a welfare plan under Section 3(2)(B)(ii) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 108.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

935.

“Wages” does not include the payment by an employer, without deduction from the remuneration of the employee, of the tax imposed upon an employee under Section 3101 of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to remuneration paid to an employee for domestic service in a private home of the employer or for agricultural labor, as defined in subsection (g) of Section 3121 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 847, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

936.

“Wages” does not include remuneration paid in any medium other than cash to an employee for service not in the course of the employer’s trade or business, except that this section shall not apply to remuneration paid for domestic service in a private home or in a local college club or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

937.
